2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-tr.pat.txt
2a1
2??1
2e1
2??1
2i1
2??1
2o1
2??1
2u1
2??1
2??1
1b1
1c1
1??1
1d1
1f1
1g1
1??1
1h1
1j1
1k1
1l1
1m1
1n1
1p1
1r1
1s1
1??1
1t1
1v1
1y1
1z1
2e2cek.
2bb
2bc
2b??
2bd
2bf
2bg
2b??
2bh
2bj
2bk
2bl
2bm
2bn
2bp
2br
2bs
2b??
2bt
2bv
2by
2bz
2cb
2cc
2c??
2cd
2cf
2cg
2c??
2ch
2cj
2ck
2cl
2cm
2cn
2cp
2cr
2cs
2c??
2ct
2cv
2cy
2cz
2??b
2??c
2????
2??d
2??f
2??g
2????
2??h
2??j
2??k
2??l
2??m
2??n
2??p
2??r
2??s
2????
2??t
2??v
2??y
2??z
2db
2dc
2d??
2dd
2df
2dg
2d??
2dh
2dj
2dk
2dl
2dm
2dn
2dp
2dr
2ds
2d??
2dt
2dv
2dy
2dz
2fb
2fc
2f??
2fd
2ff
2fg
2f??
2fh
2fj
2fk
2fl
2fm
2fn
2fp
2fr
2fs
2f??
2ft
2fv
2fy
2fz
2gb
2gc
2g??
2gd
2gf
2gg
2g??
2gh
2gj
2gk
2gl
2gm
2gn
2gp
2gr
2gs
2g??
2gt
2gv
2gy
2gz
2??b
2??c
2????
2??d
2??f
2??g
2????
2??h
2??j
2??k
2??l
2??m
2??n
2??p
2??r
2??s
2????
2??t
2??v
2??y
2??z
2hb
2hc
2h??
2hd
2hf
2hg
2h??
2hh
2hj
2hk
2hl
2hm
2hn
2hp
2hr
2hs
2h??
2ht
2hv
2hy
2hz
2jb
2jc
2j??
2jd
2jf
2jg
2j??
2jh
2jj
2jk
2jl
2jm
2jn
2jp
2jr
2js
2j??
2jt
2jv
2jy
2jz
2kb
2kc
2k??
2kd
2kf
2kg
2k??
2kh
2kj
2kk
2kl
2km
2kn
2kp
2kr
2ks
2k??
2kt
2kv
2ky
2kz
2lb
2lc
2l??
2ld
2lf
2lg
2l??
2lh
2lj
2lk
2ll
2lm
2ln
2lp
2lr
2ls
2l??
2lt
2lv
2ly
2lz
2mb
2mc
2m??
2md
2mf
2mg
2m??
2mh
2mj
2mk
2ml
2mm
2mn
2mp
2mr
2ms
2m??
2mt
2mv
2my
2mz
2nb
2nc
2n??
2nd
2nf
2ng
2n??
2nh
2nj
2nk
2nl
2nm
2nn
2np
2nr
2ns
2n??
2nt
2nv
2ny
2nz
2pb
2pc
2p??
2pd
2pf
2pg
2p??
2ph
2pj
2pk
2pl
2pm
2pn
2pp
2pr
2ps
2p??
2pt
2pv
2py
2pz
2rb
2rc
2r??
2rd
2rf
2rg
2r??
2rh
2rj
2rk
2rl
2rm
2rn
2rp
2rr
2rs
2r??
2rt
2rv
2ry
2rz
2sb
2sc
2s??
2sd
2sf
2sg
2s??
2sh
2sj
2sk
2sl
2sm
2sn
2sp
2sr
2ss
2s??
2st
2sv
2sy
2sz
2??b
2??c
2????
2??d
2??f
2??g
2????
2??h
2??j
2??k
2??l
2??m
2??n
2??p
2??r
2??s
2????
2??t
2??v
2??y
2??z
2tb
2tc
2t??
2td
2tf
2tg
2t??
2th
2tj
2tk
2tl
2tm
2tn
2tp
2tr
2ts
2t??
2tt
2tv
2ty
2tz
2vb
2vc
2v??
2vd
2vf
2vg
2v??
2vh
2vj
2vk
2vl
2vm
2vn
2vp
2vr
2vs
2v??
2vt
2vv
2vy
2vz
2yb
2yc
2y??
2yd
2yf
2yg
2y??
2yh
2yj
2yk
2yl
2ym
2yn
2yp
2yr
2ys
2y??
2yt
2yv
2yy
2yz
2zb
2zc
2z??
2zd
2zf
2zg
2z??
2zh
2zj
2zk
2zl
2zm
2zn
2zp
2zr
2zs
2z??
2zt
2zv
2zy
2zz
a3a2
a3??2
a3e2
a3??2
a3i2
a3??2
a3o2
a3??2
a3u2
a3??2
a3??2
??3a2
??3??2
??3e2
??3??2
??3i2
??3??2
??3o2
??3??2
??3u2
??3??2
??3??2
e3a2
e3??2
e3e2
e3??2
e3i2
e3??2
e3o2
e3??2
e3u2
e3??2
e3??2
??3a2
??3??2
??3e2
??3??2
??3i2
??3??2
??3o2
??3??2
??3u2
??3??2
??3??2
i3a2
i3??2
i3e2
i3??2
i3i2
i3??2
i3o2
i3??2
i3u2
i3??2
i3??2
??3a2
??3??2
??3e2
??3??2
??3i2
??3??2
??3o2
??3??2
??3u2
??3??2
??3??2
o3a2
o3??2
o3e2
o3??2
o3i2
o3??2
o3o2
o3??2
o3u2
o3??2
o3??2
??3a2
??3??2
??3e2
??3??2
??3i2
??3??2
??3o2
??3??2
??3u2
??3??2
??3??2
u3a2
u3??2
u3e2
u3??2
u3i2
u3??2
u3o2
u3??2
u3u2
u3??2
u3??2
??3a2
??3??2
??3e2
??3??2
??3i2
??3??2
??3o2
??3??2
??3u2
??3??2
??3??2
??3a2
??3??2
??3e2
??3??2
??3i2
??3??2
??3o2
??3??2
??3u2
??3??2
??3??2
tu4r4k
m1t4rak
